Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 455.
SECTION 2. The Department of Consumer and Business Services may not prohibit in  the
state building code the use of refrigerants listed as of January 1, 2022, under  regulations
adopted under 42 U.S.C. 7671k as safe alternatives to Class I  and Class II substances if the
safe alternatives are installed in accordance with applicable rules or regulations.
Passed by House April 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3227 (HB 3227-A) Page 1